Utah statutes.
31A-11-106.   Application for certificate of authority -- Deposit or bond.
(1)  Any corporation may apply, in the form specified by the commissioner, for
a certificate of authority to transact a motor club business.  The applicant
shall include with the application any documents the commissioner may
reasonably require, the deposit described in Subsection (2), which may be
waived if net worth exceeds the deposit requirements, and the fee provided for
in Section 31A-3-103.   No person may engage in the motor club business
without complying with this section and receiving a certificate of authority
under Section 31A-11-107.
(2)  The deposit required under Subsection (1) shall comply with the
requirements of Section 31A-2-206, and is $100,000.  In lieu of the deposit,
the applicant may supply a bond of a corporate surety authorized to do a
surety business in this state, in the same sum and in a form prescribed by the
commissioner, payable to the state. The deposit, or the bond, shall be
conditioned upon the corporation's faithful performance in the sale or
rendering of motor club service under the provisions of this chapter, and the
payment of fines, fees, or penalties imposed on the motor club under this
title.  Any person with a claim against the deposit or bond arising from the
motor club's breach of the conditions of the deposit or bond may bring suit in
his own name to make a claim against the deposit or bond, or the commissioner
may bring suit on behalf of claimants. In no event shall the liability of the
surety exceed the amount of the bond, regardless of the number of claimants or
claims made on the bond. Regardless of the number of years the bond continues
in force or the number of premiums payable or paid, the limit of the surety's
liability, specified as the amount of liability of the bond, is not cumulative
from year to year or from period to period.  The bond shall be forfeited up to
the amount of actual damages sustained by any claimant or claimants.  No cause
of action shall be filed against the bond after two years from the date of
termination of the bond.
(3)  If a motor club is a separate division of a corporation, the commissioner
may increase the deposit or bond requirements to take into account the
increased risk created by the other business of the corporation.  However, the
deposit or bond requirement may not be more than twice the amounts required
under Subsection (2).
